Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,149
Abandonment of an entity conversion.

(MBCA 9.56) (a) Unless
otherwise provided in a plan of entity conversion of a domestic business corporation,
after the plan has been adopted and approved as required by sections 21-2,143
to 21-2,149 and at any time before the entity conversion has become effective,
it may be abandoned by the board of directors without action by the shareholders.

(b) If an entity conversion
is abandoned after articles of entity conversion or articles of charter surrender
have been filed with the Secretary of State but before the entity conversion
has become effective, a statement that the entity conversion has been abandoned
in accordance with this section, signed by an officer or other duly authorized
representative, shall be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing prior
to the effective date of the entity conversion. Upon filing, the statement
shall take effect and the entity conversion shall be deemed abandoned and
shall not become effective.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 149.
January 1, 2016